Tennessee, session 114, HB0302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-139(a), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (2):
(2) It is an offense for an occupant of a vehicle to park, leave standing, or stop
the vehicle on a street or highway and to block or impede the normal movement of traffic
for the purpose of soliciting, negotiating, or consummating an employment transaction
with a person standing on or in proximity to the street or highway.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-139(e), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(e) A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor; except, that:
(1) A person who violates subsection (c) must receive a warning citation
for a first offense; and
(2) If a vehicle parked, left standing, or stopped on a street or highway in
violation of subdivision (a)(2) causes or contributes to a motor vehicle accident,
then a violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0302
001442
- 1 -